Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.286

Limitations on the use of gas—Prohibition.

A city or town shall not in any way prohibit, penalize, or discourage the use of gas for any form of heating, or for uses related to any appliance or equipment, in any building.

[ 2025 c 1 s 9 (Initiative Measure No. 2066, approved November 5, 2024).]

NOTES:

Findings—2025 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 2066): See note following RCW 80.28.110.